test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_VLONGVW_NoExtra_bingode_gt-norm.yaml
     bingode+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret: bingodeensiminiiban
     bingode+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: bingodeensimini***idig, idog***
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: bingodeenhiminaaniban
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: bingodeenhiminaan***idig, idog***
     bingode+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: bingodeenhimiwaaiban
     bingode+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: bingodeenhimiwaa***idig, idog***
     bingode+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret: bingodeenhiminiiban
     bingode+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: bingodeenhimini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 7
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: bingodeensiminaanan
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: bingodeensiminaanag
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: bingodeensiminaaning
     bingode+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Obv: bingodeensimiwaaan
     bingode+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pl: bingodeensimiwaaag
     bingode+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Loc: bingodeensimiwaaing
     bingode+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Obv: bingodeensiminian
     bingode+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pl: bingodeensiminiag
     bingode+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Loc: bingodeensiminiing
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: bingodeenhiminaanan
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: bingodeenhiminaanag
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: bingodeenhiminaaning
     bingode+Con+Pos+PosPl+Obv: bingodeenhimiwaaan
     bingode+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pl: bingodeenhimiwaaag
     bingode+Con+Pos+PosPl+Loc: bingodeenhimiwaaing
     bingode+Con+Pos+PosObv+Obv: bingodeenhiminian
     bingode+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pl: bingodeenhiminiag
     bingode+Con+Pos+PosObv+Loc: bingodeenhiminiing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 6, 7
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pret+Obv: bingodeensimibanan
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pret+Pl: bingodeensimibanag
     bingode+Dim+Pos+Pret+Loc: bingodeensimibaning
     bingode+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Obv: bingodeensim***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Pl: bingodeensim***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Loc: bingodeensim***idig, idog***ing
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pret+Obv: bingodeenhimibanan
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pret+Pl: bingodeenhimibanag
     bingode+Con+Pos+Pret+Loc: bingodeenhimibaning
     bingode+Con+Pos+VocPl+Obv: bingodeenhim***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Con+Pos+VocPl+Pl: bingodeenhim***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Con+Pos+VocPl+Loc: bingodeenhim***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6
     bingode+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: bingodeensishinaaniban
     bingode+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: bingodeensishinaan***idig, idog***
     bingode+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret: bingodeensishiwaaiban
     bingode+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: bingodeensishiwaa***idig, idog***
     bingode+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret: bingodeensishiniiban
     bingode+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: bingodeensishini***idig, idog***
     bingode+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: bingodeenhishinaaniban
     bingode+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: bingodeenhishinaan***idig, idog***
     bingode+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret: bingodeenhishiwaaiban
     bingode+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: bingodeenhishiwaa***idig, idog***
     bingode+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret: bingodeenhishiniiban
     bingode+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: bingodeenhishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 7
     bingode+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: bingodeensishinaanan
     bingode+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: bingodeensishinaanag
     bingode+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: bingodeensishinaaning
     bingode+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Obv: bingodeensishiwaaan
     bingode+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pl: bingodeensishiwaaag
     bingode+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Loc: bingodeensishiwaaing
     bingode+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Obv: bingodeensishinian
     bingode+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pl: bingodeensishiniag
     bingode+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Loc: bingodeensishiniing
     bingode+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: bingodeenhishinaanan
     bingode+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: bingodeenhishinaanag
     bingode+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: bingodeenhishinaaning
     bingode+Con+Pej+PosPl+Obv: bingodeenhishiwaaan
     bingode+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pl: bingodeenhishiwaaag
     bingode+Con+Pej+PosPl+Loc: bingodeenhishiwaaing
     bingode+Con+Pej+PosObv+Obv: bingodeenhishinian
     bingode+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pl: bingodeenhishiniag
     bingode+Con+Pej+PosObv+Loc: bingodeenhishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     bingode+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: bingodeensishibanan
     bingode+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: bingodeensishibanag
     bingode+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: bingodeensishibaning
     bingode+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Obv: bingodeensish***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Pl: bingodeensish***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Loc: bingodeensish***idig, idog***ing
     bingode+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: bingodeenhishibanan
     bingode+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: bingodeenhishibanag
     bingode+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: bingodeenhishibaning
     bingode+Con+Pej+VocPl+Obv: bingodeenhish***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Con+Pej+VocPl+Pl: bingodeenhish***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Con+Pej+VocPl+Loc: bingodeenhish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5, 6, 7
     bingode+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: bingodeensinaanibanan
     bingode+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: bingodeensinaanibanag
     bingode+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: bingodeensinaanibaning
     bingode+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: bingodeensinaan***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: bingodeensinaan***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: bingodeensinaan***idig, idog***ing
     bingode+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Obv: bingodeensiwaaibanan
     bingode+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Pl: bingodeensiwaaibanag
     bingode+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Loc: bingodeensiwaaibaning
     bingode+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: bingodeensiwaa***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: bingodeensiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: bingodeensiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     bingode+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Obv: bingodeensiniibanan
     bingode+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Pl: bingodeensiniibanag
     bingode+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Loc: bingodeensiniibaning
     bingode+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: bingodeensini***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: bingodeensini***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: bingodeensini***idig, idog***ing
     bingode+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: bingodeenhinaanibanan
     bingode+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: bingodeenhinaanibanag
     bingode+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: bingodeenhinaanibaning
     bingode+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: bingodeenhinaan***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: bingodeenhinaan***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: bingodeenhinaan***idig, idog***ing
     bingode+Con+PosPl+Pret+Obv: bingodeenhiwaaibanan
     bingode+Con+PosPl+Pret+Pl: bingodeenhiwaaibanag
     bingode+Con+PosPl+Pret+Loc: bingodeenhiwaaibaning
     bingode+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: bingodeenhiwaa***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: bingodeenhiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: bingodeenhiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     bingode+Con+PosObv+Pret+Obv: bingodeenhiniibanan
     bingode+Con+PosObv+Pret+Pl: bingodeenhiniibanag
     bingode+Con+PosObv+Pret+Loc: bingodeenhiniibaning
     bingode+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: bingodeenhini***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: bingodeenhini***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: bingodeenhini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6
     bingode+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: bingodeimishinaaniban
     bingode+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: bingodeimishinaan***idig, idog***
     bingode+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: bingodeimishiwaaiban
     bingode+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: bingodeimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     bingode+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: bingodeimishiniiban
     bingode+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: bingodeimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 7
     bingode+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: bingodeimishinaanan
     bingode+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: bingodeimishinaanag
     bingode+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: bingodeimishinaaning
     bingode+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: bingodeimishiwaaan
     bingode+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: bingodeimishiwaaag
     bingode+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: bingodeimishiwaaing
     bingode+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: bingodeimishinian
     bingode+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: bingodeimishiniag
     bingode+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: bingodeimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 6, 7
     bingode+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: bingodeimishibanan
     bingode+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: bingodeimishibanag
     bingode+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: bingodeimishibaning
     bingode+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: bingodeimish***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: bingodeimish***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: bingodeimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5, 6, 7
     bingode+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: bingodeiminaanibanan
     bingode+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: bingodeiminaanibanag
     bingode+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: bingodeiminaanibaning
     bingode+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: bingodeiminaan***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: bingodeiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: bingodeiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     bingode+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: bingodeimiwaaibanan
     bingode+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: bingodeimiwaaibanag
     bingode+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: bingodeimiwaaibaning
     bingode+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: bingodeimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: bingodeimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: bingodeimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     bingode+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: bingodeiminiibanan
     bingode+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: bingodeiminiibanag
     bingode+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: bingodeiminiibaning
     bingode+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: bingodeimini***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: bingodeimini***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: bingodeimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5, 6, 7
     bingode+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: bingodeishinaanibanan
     bingode+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: bingodeishinaanibanag
     bingode+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: bingodeishinaanibaning
     bingode+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: bingodeishinaan***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: bingodeishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: bingodeishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     bingode+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: bingodeishiwaaibanan
     bingode+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: bingodeishiwaaibanag
     bingode+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: bingodeishiwaaibaning
     bingode+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: bingodeishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: bingodeishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: bingodeishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     bingode+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: bingodeishiniibanan
     bingode+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: bingodeishiniibanag
     bingode+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: bingodeishiniibaning
     bingode+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: bingodeishini***idig, idog***an
     bingode+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: bingodeishini***idig, idog***ag
     bingode+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: bingodeishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     +Px1bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: nibingodeensimishinaan
     +Px1bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: nibingodeensimishiwaa
     +Px1bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: nibingodeensimishini
     +Px1bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: nibingodeenhimishinaan
     +Px1bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: nibingodeenhimishiwaa
     +Px1bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: nibingodeenhimishini
     +Px2bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: gibingodeensimishinaan
     +Px2bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: gibingodeensimishiwaa
     +Px2bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: gibingodeensimishini
     +Px2bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: gibingodeenhimishinaan
     +Px2bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: gibingodeenhimishiwaa
     +Px2bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: gibingodeenhimishini
     +Px3bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: obingodeensimishinaan
     +Px3bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: obingodeensimishiwaa
     +Px3bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: obingodeensimishini
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: obingodeenhimishinaan
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: obingodeenhimishiwaa
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: obingodeenhimishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     +Px1bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: nibingodeensimishiban
     +Px1bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: nibingodeensimish***idig, idog***
     +Px1bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: nibingodeenhimishiban
